Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1904
READY Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The READY Cash Fund is created. The fund shall contain money received from private sources to underwrite the costs of the Nebraska Read, Educate, and Develop Youth Act. The fund shall be used by the State Department of Education and the Department of Health and Human Services to aid in carrying out their duties under the act. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. Any money in the fund available for investment may be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2002, LB 326, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 716.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.